Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7165.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, the
Honorable Mayor Frank Picozzi may join Madeline Marie Hopkins and Cameron David Charron
in marriage within the City of Warwick, Rhode Island on or about February 10, 2026. The
Honorable Mayor Frank Picozzi is hereby authorized and empowered to join the foregoing persons
in marriage pursuant to and in accordance with Chapter 3 of Title 15 of the General laws, entitled
“Solemnization of Marriages.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004368
========